Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1743
Collection of taxes; county treasurer; credit on settlement for delinquent real property taxes and special assessments.

If any lands or lots shall be delinquent for taxes or special assessments, the treasurer shall be entitled to a credit in his final settlement for the amount of the several assessments thereon, the county to allow the amount of printer's fees thereon, and be entitled to the fees when collected.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 170, p. 452;

R.S.1913, § 6498;

C.S.1922, § 6026;

C.S.1929, § 77-1931;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 9, p. 642;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 9, p. 427;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 9, p. 613;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-1931;

R.S.1943, § 77-1743.